Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 181A.972 is amended to read:
181A.972. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Institution of higher education” has the meaning given that term in ORS 163A.005.
(b) “Private security  professional” and “private security provider” have the meanings given
those terms in ORS 181A.840.
(2)(a) An institution of  higher education that employs or contracts with a private security pro-
vider, or the governing board of a public  university listed in ORS 352.002 that commissions special
campus security officers under ORS 352.118 to provide security services on  campus, shall ensure
that a nationwide criminal records check is conducted  for each private security professional or
special campus security officer providing security services on campus.
(b) The governing board  of a public university listed in ORS 352.002 that commissions
special campus security officers  under ORS 352.118 to provide security services on campus
shall ensure that background information,  including information about disciplinary action,
about a special  campus security officer is requested from the Department of Public Safety
Standards and Training and reviewed before commissioning the officer.
[(b)] (c) The governing board of a public university listed in ORS 352.002 that commissions
special campus security officers under ORS 352.118 to  provide security services on campus shall
ensure that each officer undergoes psychological testing to  determine the officer’s fitness to serve
as a special campus security officer.
(3)(a) A law enforcement agency may share  information about applicants for employment with
the agency with an institution of higher education. An institution  of higher education may use in-
formation shared under this subsection for purposes of hiring private  security professionals or spe-
cial campus security officers.
(b) The Department of Public  Safety Standards and Training may share information
about an applicant to serve as a special campus security officer  with a public university
listed in ORS 352.002. A public university may  use information shared under this subsection
for the purpose of hiring special campus security officers.
(4) A private security provider that  provides security services on the campus of an institution
of higher education or  the governing board of a public university listed in ORS 352.002 that com-
missions special campus security officers under ORS  352.118 to provide security services on campus
shall ensure that:
Enrolled House Bill 2551 (HB 2551-A) Page 1
(a) Vehicles used by private security professionals or  special campus security officers in the
scope of their employment on campus are equipped with:
(A) A global positioning system device, as defined in ORS  163.715, for which global positioning
data is retained for at least 90 days;
(B) A video camera that records the scene within the vehicle and for  which video recordings
are retained for at least 90 days; or
(C) A dispatch system for which a record of calls is maintained for at least 90 days.
(b) Uniforms worn by  private security professionals or special campus security officers in the
scope of their employment on campus can be easily differentiated from the uniform of any law
enforcement officer certified by the Department of Public Safety  Standards and Training, with dif-
ferentiations including, but not limited  to, prominent designation of “campus security” or prominent
use of a school logo or school colors.
(5) An institution  of higher education that employs or contracts with a private security provider,
or the governing board of a public university listed in ORS 352.002 that  commissions special campus
security officers under ORS 352.118 to provide  security services on campus, shall ensure that vehi-
cles used by private security professionals or special campus  security officers in the scope of their
employment on campus:
(a) Are clearly identified as a campus vehicle on the front of the vehicle;
(b) Do not use red and blue light bars;
(c) Do not use bumpers intended to ram another vehicle in order to cause a stall; and
(d) Do not use cages.
(6) When a private security professional or special campus security officer makes  a probable
cause arrest or an  arrest under ORS 133.225 in the course of the individual’s duties on the campus
of an  institution of higher education, the institution of higher education or governing board of the
public university listed in ORS 352.002 for whom the individual provides security services:
(a) Shall promptly notify a law  enforcement agency with jurisdiction over the area in which the
arrest took place.
(b) May not retain evidence related to the arrest except for the purpose of providing the  evi-
dence to a law enforcement agency with jurisdiction over the area in which the arrest took place.
(7) Private security professionals and special campus security officers commissioned under ORS
352.118 who provide security services on the campus of an  institution of higher education do not
have stop and frisk authority as set forth in ORS 131.605 to 131.625.
(8) If an institution of higher education contracts with  a private security provider to provide
temporary security  for an event, the terms of the contract must require the private security provider
to comply  with all relevant statutes and rules governing the duties of contracted private security
providers.
Enrolled House Bill 2551 (HB 2551-A) Page 2
Passed by House March 4, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 1, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2551 (HB 2551-A) Page 3